Wyoming, session 2025, HB0332.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-3-522 is amended to read:

18-3-522. Membership in organizations for furtherance
of good government.

HB0332

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0754
Each board of county commissioners and any elected county
official may take out a county membership and cooperate
with associations and organizations of other counties or
county officials within or without this state for the
furtherance of good government and the protection of county
interests. The cost of membership may shall not be paid
with county funds. Unless otherwise provided by law, no
county shall reimburse the costs of room, board or travel
that are related to a county's activity with an association
or organization with whom the county is cooperating or has
a membership. All agendas, correspondence, communications,
financial statements, minutes, reports, presentations and
training materials created by a county and related to the
county's activity with an association or organization with
whom the county is cooperating or has a membership shall be
public records. County commissioner members and any elected
county official who conducts association or organization
business while acting in their official capacity or while
using county resources shall document the time and nature
of the work performed each week and shall submit a monthly
report to their board of county commissioners at their
monthly meeting.

HB0332

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0754
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0332